Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.655

Leave sharing program—Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 41.04.650 through 41.04.670, 28A.400.380, and section 7, chapter 93, Laws of 1989.

(1) "Domestic violence" means any of the following acts committed by one family or household member against another or by one intimate partner against another, as those terms are defined in RCW 10.99.020:

(a) Physical harm, bodily injury, assault, or the infliction of fear of imminent physical harm, bodily injury, or assault;

(b) Sexual assault; or

(c) Stalking as defined in RCW 9A.46.110.

(2) "Employee" means any employee of the state, including employees of school districts and educational service districts, who are entitled to accrue sick leave or annual leave and for whom accurate leave records are maintained.

(3) "Parental leave" means leave to bond and care for a newborn child after birth or to bond and care for a child after placement for adoption or foster care.

(4) "Pregnancy disability" means a pregnancy-related medical condition or miscarriage.

(5) "Program" means the leave sharing program established in RCW 41.04.660.

(6) "Service in the uniformed services" means the performance of duty on a voluntary or involuntary basis in a uniformed service under competent authority and includes active duty, active duty for training, initial active duty for training, inactive duty training, full-time national guard duty including state-ordered active duty, and a period for which a person is absent from a position of employment for the purpose of an examination to determine the fitness of the person to perform any such duty.

(7) "Sexual assault" has the same meaning as set forth in RCW 70.125.030.

(8) "Stalking" has the same meaning as set forth in RCW 9A.46.110.

(9) "State agency" or "agency" means departments, offices, agencies, or institutions of state government, the legislature, institutions of higher education, school districts, and educational service districts.

(10) "Uniformed services" means the armed forces, the army national guard, and the air national guard of any state, territory, commonwealth, possession, or district when engaged in active duty for training, inactive duty training, full-time national guard duty, or state active duty, the commissioned corps of the public health service, the coast guard, and any other category of persons designated by the president of the United States in time of war or national emergency.

(11) "Victim" means a person against whom domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking has been committed as defined in this section.

[ 2021 c 215 s 148. Prior: 2020 c 29 s 14; 2020 c 6 s 1; 2018 c 39 s 2; 2008 c 36 s 1; 2003 1st sp.s. c 12 s 1; 1990 c 33 s 569; 1989 c 93 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.

Effective date—2020 c 29: See note following RCW 7.77.060.

Effective date—2018 c 39: See note following RCW 41.04.650.

Effective date—2008 c 36: "This act takes effect October 1, 2008." [ 2008 c 36 s 4.]

Effective date—2003 1st sp.s. c 12: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [June 20, 2003]." [ 2003 1st sp.s. c 12 s 4.]

Purpose—Statutory references—Severability—1990 c 33: See RCW 28A.900.100 through 28A.900.102.

Severability—1989 c 93: See note following RCW 41.04.650.